Utah statutes.
7-7-12.   Inspection of books and records -- Confidentiality --
Communication between members or stockholders.
(1)  Every member, stockholder, or borrower of an association shall have the
right to inspect, upon paying any costs of retrieval or reproduction and upon
reasonable notice and during regular business hours:
(a)  the books and records of the association which do not contain any
confidential information relating to a loan, savings account, or voting rights
of another member, stockholder, or borrower; and
(b)  such books and records of the association as pertain to the member's,
stockholder's, or borrower's own loan, savings account, or the determination
of the member's, stockholder's, or borrower's voting rights.
(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (1), the right of inspection and
examination of the books, accounts, and records shall be limited to:
(a)  the commissioner and supervisor, or their duly authorized
representatives;
(b)  persons authorized to act for the association;
(c)  any federal or state instrumentality or agency authorized to inspect or
examine the books and records of an insured association;
(d)  the Office of Thrift Supervision, the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation, or their successor agencies; and
(e)  any person acting under authority of a court of competent jurisdiction.
(3)  Except as otherwise stated in this section, the books and records
pertaining to the accounts, loans, and voting rights of savers, borrowers,
members, and stockholders shall be kept confidential by the association, its
directors, officers, and employees, and by the commissioner, the supervisor,
and their examiners and representatives, unless disclosure is expressly or
impliedly authorized by the saver, borrower, member, or stockholder.
(4)  Each member or stockholder of an association has the right to communicate
with other members or stockholders of the same association with reference to
any question pending or to be presented for consideration at a meeting of the
members or stockholders.  A member or stockholder, in order to communicate
with other members or stockholders, shall submit to the association a request,
subscribed by the member or stockholder, which includes:
(a)  the member's or stockholder's full name and address;
(b)  the nature and extent of the member's or stockholder's interest in the
association at the time the member's or stockholder's application for
communication is made;
(c)  a statement of the reasons for and purposes of the communication and that
the communication is not for any reason other than the business welfare of the
association;
(d)  a copy of the communication; and
(e)  if the communication concerns a question to be raised at a meeting of the
members or stockholders of the association, the date of the meeting at which
the matter will be presented.
(5)  Within 10 days after receipt of the request referred to in Subsection (4)
the association shall notify the requesting member or stockholder of:
(a)  the approximate number of the members or stockholders and the estimated
amount of the reasonable costs and expenses of mailing the communication; or
(b)  its determination to refuse the request and the specific reasons for its
refusal, including its determination whether or not the request has been made
for a proper purpose.
(6)  Unless the association has refused the request referred to in Subsection
(5), the association shall, within seven days after receipt of the sum
specified by it under this Subsection (6) and sufficient copies of the
communication, mail the communication to all its members or stockholders.
(7)  If a request referred to in Subsection (4) is refused by an association,
the requesting member or stockholder may submit the member's or stockholder's
request and the refusal of the request to the supervisor for review.  The
supervisor may issue an order denying the request or, if the supervisor finds
the request is not for any reason other than the business welfare of the
association and is in all other respects proper, granting the request and
directing the association to mail the communication to all its members or
stockholders in accordance with the provisions of Subsections (5) and (6).
(8)  Insofar as the provisions of this section are not inconsistent with
federal law, this section shall apply to a federal association whose home
offices are located in this state, and to the members or stockholders of that
federal association except that any review of a refusal by an association
under Subsection (5) shall be tendered to the Office of Thrift Supervision or
successor federal agency in the case of a federal association.
